District of Columbia statutes.
29-201.05

Status of filings.

A filing under this chapter signed by a domestic entity shall become part of the public organic record of the entity if the entity’s organic law provides that similar filings under that law become part of the public organic record of the entity.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(b)(3), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 twice substituted “record” for “document.”
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.